Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF76.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1283XS (2) 91 ll/ns S.F. 76 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 99F.5A Limitations on issuance of 1 licenses to conduct gambling games. 2 1. a. Commencing on the effective date of this Act, through 3 June 30, 2030, the total number of licenses issued by the 4 commission to conduct gambling games on an excursion gambling 5 boat, at a gambling structure, or at a pari-mutuel racetrack 6 shall not exceed nineteen subject to the requirements of this 7 subsection. 8 b. Licenses to conduct gambling games shall be restricted 9 to those counties where an excursion gambling boat, gambling 10 structure, or racetrack enclosure was operating and licensed to 11 conduct gambling games on the effective date of this Act. 12 c. The commission shall be authorized to take any of the 13 following actions concerning the issuance of licenses to 14 conduct gambling games: 15 (1) A gambling games licensee may move to a new location 16 within the same county and retain the gambling games license. 17 (2) A licensed facility may be sold and a new gambling games 18 license issued for operation in the same county. 19 (3) If a license to conduct gambling games is surrendered, 20 not renewed, or revoked, a new gambling games license may be 21 issued for operation in the same county. 22 2. This section is repealed July 1, 2030. 23 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 24 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 25